Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4005.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-701.05, to read: START_STATUTE15-701.05. Instruction on artificial intelligence; report; definition A. Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, each school district shall provide instruction on the ethical, moral and educational uses of artificial intelligence to all students who are enrolled in each of grades three, six, eight, ten and twelve.  The department of education shall adopt a curriculum for the instruction required by this subsection and shall include in the curriculum instruction on: 1. Basic techniques for using artificial intelligence, including techniques for writing prompts. 2. Ethical considerations for using and adopting artificial intelligence in learning and in daily life. 3. How artificial intelligence might threaten human health and human existence. B. school districts may provide the instruction required by subsection A of this section through a separate course for each grade level or by incorporating the equivalent instructional time into existing curricula. C. On or before October 15 of each year, each school district in this state shall submit a report to the department of education that describes the instruction that the school district provides pursuant to this section and enrollment metrics for the course or courses through which the instruction is provided. D. The department of education: 1. may provide guidelines, resources or grants, or a combination of guidelines, resources and grants, to school districts for the implementation of this section. 2. For the purposes of adopting a curriculum pursuant to subsection A of this section, shall select a curriculum that is developed by an organization that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is a school within a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona BOARD of regents that maintains a campus in the most populous county within this state. (b) Was established before 2018, but not before 2015. (c) Fosters a culture of intellectual diversity and promotes ideas that are foundational to a healthy constitutional democracy. (d) Serves as a community resource for civic education. E. For the purposes of this section, "artificial intelligence": 1. Means a machine-based system that is able to make predictions, recommendations or decisions. 2. Includes generative systems that produce content in response to prompts. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Legislative findings The legislature finds that: 1. Artificial intelligence is becoming prevalent in society. 2. Students in this state must understand the ethical, moral and educational uses of artificial intelligence to avoid falling behind globally. 3. Public schools have a responsibility to prepare students with basic skills in prompting and the ethical uses of artificial intelligence. 4. Requiring at least one course, or the equivalent instruction, in each of grades three, six, eight, ten and twelve on the ethical, moral and educational uses of artificial intelligence will promote the responsible integration of artificial intelligence into education and students' future careers.